Washington statutes.
RCW 39.35.020

Legislative declaration.

The legislature declares that it is the public policy of this state to ensure that energy conservation practices, greenhouse gas emissions reduction practices, and renewable energy systems are employed in the design of major publicly owned or leased facilities and that the use of all-electric energy systems and at least one renewable energy or combined heat and power system is considered. To this end the legislature authorizes and directs that public agencies analyze the cost of energy consumption of each major facility and each critical governmental facility to be planned and constructed or renovated after September 8, 1975.

[ 2022 c 178 s 2; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 19 s 3; 1982 c 159 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 177 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2015 3rd sp.s. c 19: See note following RCW 39.35.010.

Applicability—1982 c 159: See notes following RCW 39.35.010.